District of Columbia statutes.
7-503.02

Executive Director — Appointment; compensation; staff.

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director, who shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council of the District of Columbia, from a list of not more than 3 names submitted to him by the Commission. The Director shall devote his full time to the duties of his office. His annual compensation shall be fixed in accordance with Chapter 51 of Title 5, United States Code (relating to the classification of government employees and related matters), but shall be not less than a GS-15, Step 1 or the equivalent compensation pursuant to the provisions of subchapter XI of Chapter 6 of Title 1. He shall have such staff as is approved in the current District government budget and federal grants, plus any temporary staff approved by the Office of Budget and Management Systems.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title III, § 302, 22 DCR 2457
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(t), 25 DCR 5740
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02 and § 7-701.01.
1981 Ed., § 6-2212.
1973 Ed., § 6-1712.
“GS-15, Step 1,” referred to in the second sentence, is contained in the General Schedule, which is set out following § 5332 of Title 5, United States Code.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 7-218, the “District of Columbia Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-86, April 28, 1989.